Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 9. General Provisions.

Sec. 10.15.580.
Powers of department.

The department has the power and authority reasonably necessary to administer this chapter efficiently and to perform the duties imposed by this chapter.

History.

(§ 63 ch 107 SLA 1959)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.15.585.
Application of chapter.

This chapter applies to the fullest extent permitted by the laws and constitution of the United States and of the state to all existing cooperative associations incorporated under a previously existing law of the state relating to incorporation of cooperative associations. However, this section does not apply to cooperatives organized to generate and transmit electric energy and power or to furnish electric or telephone or related telecommunications service.

History.

(§ 67 ch 107 SLA 1959; am § 3 ch 29 SLA 2020)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective April 30, 2020, added “or related telecommunications” near the end.

Sec. 10.15.590.
Effect of amendment or repeal of chapter.

This chapter may be amended, repealed, or modified, but an amendment, repeal, or modification does not affect vested rights or take away or impair a remedy for a liability that has been previously incurred.

History.

(§ 68 ch 107 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.15.595.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“articles” means articles of incorporation;

“board” means board of directors;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development;

“cooperative” means a cooperative corporation subject to the provisions of this chapter;

“corporation” means a corporation that is not a cooperative;

“court” means superior court;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“foreign cooperative” means a cooperative corporation organized under laws other than the laws of this state;

“member” means a person who has been qualified and accepted for membership in a cooperative;

“membership stock” means a class of stock, continuous ownership of which is required for membership in a cooperative;

“shareholder” means a holder of shares of capital stock of a cooperative other than membership stock.

History.

(§ 2 ch 107 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 48 SLA 1960; am § 69 ch 218 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” and “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development” and “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 10.15.600.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Alaska Cooperative Corporation Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1959)